fr: Lecteur compatible: Lecteur CD; Ordinateur portable; Lecteur MP3; Lecteur DVD portable; Smartphone; Tablette; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Autre
de: Kompatibles Abspielgerät: CD-Player; Laptop; MP3-Player; Tragbarer DVD-Player; Smartphone; Tablet; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Sonstiges
en: Compatible player: CD player; Laptop; MP3 player; Portable DVD player; Smartphone; Tablet; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Other
vi: Trình phát tương thích: Máy nghe đĩa CD; Máy tính xách tay; Máy nghe nhạc MP3; Máy xem DVD xách tay; Điện thoại thông minh; Máy tính bảng; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Khác
tr: Uyumlu oynatıcı: CD çalar; Laptop; MP3 çalar; Taşınabilir DVD oynatıcı; Akıllı telefon; Tablet; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Diğer
ru: Совместимые проигрыватели: CD-проигрыватель; Ноутбук; MP3-проигрыватель; Портативный DVD-плеер; Смартфон; Планшет; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Другое
zh-TW: 相容播放器: CD 播放機; 筆記型電腦; MP3 播放器; 手提DVD播放器; 智慧型手機; 平板電腦; iPad; iPhone; iPod; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilný prehrávač: CD prehrávač; Notebook; MP3 prehrávač; Prenosný DVD prehrávač; Smartfón; Tablet; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Iné
nl: Compatibele speler: Cd-speler; Laptop; Mp3-speler; Draagbare dvd-speler; Smartphone; Tablet; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Andere
el: Συμβατή συσκευή αναπαραγωγής: Αναπαραγωγή CD; Φορητός υπολογιστής; MP3 player; Φορητή συσκευή αναπαραγωγής DVD; Smartphone; Τάμπλετ; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Άλλο
nb: Kompatibel spiller: CD-spiller; Laptop; MP3-spiller; Bærbar DVD-spiller; Smarttelefon; Nettbrett; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Annet
th: เครื่องเล่นที่เข้ากันได้: เครื่องเล่นซีดี; แล็ปท็อป; เครื่องเล่น MP3; เครื่องเล่นดีวีดีพกพา; สมาร์ทโฟน; แท็บเล็ต; iPad; iPhone; iPod; อื่นๆ
cs: Kompatibilní přehrávač: Přehrávač CD; Notebook; Přehrávač MP3; Přenosný DVD přehrávač; Smartphone; Tablet; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Jiné
es: Reproductor compatible: Reproductores de CD; Computadora portátil; Reproductor de MP3; Reproductor de DVD portátil; Teléfono inteligente; Tableta; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Otros
sl-SI: Združljiv predvajalnik: CD-predvajalnik; Prenosni računalnik; MP3 predvajalnik; Prenosni DVD predvajalnik; Pametni telefon; Tablični računalnik; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Drugo
pt-PT: Leitor compatível: Leitor de CD; Portátil; Leitor de MP3; Leitor de DVD portátil; Smartphone; Tablet; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Outro
lt-LT: Suderinamas grotuvas: CD grotuvas; Nešiojamasis kompiuteris; MP3 grotuvas; Nešiojamasis DVD grotuvas; Išmanusis telefonas; Planšetinis kompiuteris; „iPad“; „iPhone“; „iPod“; Kita
sv: Kompatibel spelare: CD spelare; Bärbar dator; MP3-spelare; Bärbar DVD-spelare; Smartphone; Surfplatta; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Övrigt
it: Lettore compatibile: Lettore CD; Computer portatile; Lettore MP3; Lettore DVD portatile; Smartphone; Tablet; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Altro
ro-RO: Player compatibil: CD player; Laptop; MP3 player; DVD player portabil; Smartphone; Tabletă; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Altele
zh-CN: 兼容播放器: CD 播放机; 笔记本电脑; MP3 播放器; 便携式 DVD 播放机; 智能手机; 平板电脑; iPad; iPhone; iPod; 其他
da: Kompatibel afspiller: CD-afspiller; Laptop; MP3-afspiller; Bærbar DVD-afspiller; Smartphone; Tablet; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Andet
fi: Yhteensopiva toistolaite: CD-soitin; Kannettava tietokone; MP3-soitin; Kannettava DVD-soitin; Älypuhelin; Tabletti; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Muu
hr-HR: Kompatibilni uređaj za reprodukciju: Uređaj za reprodukciju CD-ova; Prijenosno računalo; MP3 uređaj; Prijenosni uređaj za reprodukciju DVD-ova; Pametni telefon; Tablet; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Ostalo
bg-BG: Съвместим плейър: CD плейър; Лаптоп; MP3 плейър; Преносим DVD плейър; Смартфон; Таблет; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Други
pl: Kompatybilny odtwarzacz: Odtwarzacz CD; Laptop; Odtwarzacz MP3; Przenośny odtwarzacz DVD; Smartfon; Tablet; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Inne
ja: 使用可能なプレーヤー: CDプレーヤー; ラップトップ; MP3プレーヤー; ポータブルDVDプレーヤー; スマートフォン; タブレット; iPad; iPhone; iPod; その他
pt-BR: Reprodutor compatível: Leitor de CD; Laptop; Reprodutor de MP3; Aparelho de DVD portátil; Smartphone; Tablet; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Outro
ko: 호환 가능한 플레이어: CD 플레이어; 랩톱; MP3 플레이어; 휴대용 DVD 플레이어; 스마트폰; 정제; iPad; iPhone; iPod; 기타
hu: Kompatibilis lejátszó: CD-lejátszó; Laptop; MP3-lejátszó; Hordozható DVD-lejátszó; Okostelefon; Táblagép; iPad; iPhone; iPod; Egyéb